test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-mierr_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - mieʹrr a-stem määrä: # Noun - full paradigm
     mieʹrr+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: mieʹrr
     mieʹrr+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: meäʹr
     mieʹrr+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: meäʹr
     mieʹrr+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: meärra
     mieʹrr+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: meäʹrest
     mieʹrr+N+Sg+Com+Indef: meäʹrin
     mieʹrr+N+Ess+Indef: mieʹrren
     mieʹrr+N+Par+Indef: mieʹrred
     mieʹrr+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [meäʹrtaa, meäʹrtää]
     mieʹrr+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: meäʹr
     mieʹrr+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: meäʹri
     mieʹrr+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: meäʹrid
     mieʹrr+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: meäʹrid
     mieʹrr+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: meäʹrin
     mieʹrr+N+Pl+Com+Indef: meäʹrivuiʹm
     mieʹrr+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [meäʹritaa, meäʹritää]
